New Jersey, session 222, A4275.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.         Within one year of the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.   ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the New Jersey Innovation Authority and the Office of Information Technology shall jointly develop and maintain an online Statewide tracking system, called the New Jersey Permitting Dashboard (the dashboard), for certain permits issued by principal departments in the Executive Branch of State government, and any agencies, commissions, boards, bureaus, offices, or instrumentalities within or created by the principal departments, and any independent State authority, commission, instrumentality, or agency. b.    (1)  The purpose of the dashboard shall be to improve accountability and reduce delays within the State permitting process. (2)   (a) The dashboard shall include permits designated as appropriate for inclusion in the sole discretion of the New Jersey Innovation Authority and the Office of Information Technology. (b)   The permits that may be included in the dashboard are those issued in connection with construction; manufacturing; energy generation, transmission, or distribution; real estate development; operation of a business; or the provision of goods or services by a principal department in the Executive Branch of State government or agency of the State. (c)   The dashboard shall not include professional and occupational licenses or any certifications or authorizations issued by any professional or occupational licensing board established under Title 45 of the Revised Statutes. c.     The dashboard shall: (1)   be an interactive, online portal that displays the status and progress of State permit applications for active projects in the State of New Jersey and allows for the tracking of permit applications by permit applicants, State departments, and the public; and (2)   display information in a manner consistent with all applicable federal and State laws and regulations. d.    (1)        All principal departments in the Executive Branch of State government, and any agencies, commissions, boards, bureaus, offices, or instrumentalities within or created by the principal departments, and any independent State authority, commission, instrumentality, or agency that issue permits or contribute to permitting processes shall cooperate fully with  the New Jersey Innovation Authority and the Office of Information Technology to support the dashboard, to the extent that available resources will permit.  Cooperation shall include submission of timely data as requested. (2)   The Office of Information Technology shall be responsible for providing the enterprise platform for any application and permit data necessary for the dashboard. (3)   At the discretion of the New Jersey Innovation Authority and the Office of Information Technology, county and municipal governments may also be encouraged to participate in the submission of data, materials, and process updates related to the dashboard. 2.    The Office of Information Technology, in conjunction with the New Jersey Innovation Authority, shall adopt rules and regulations, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.140 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act. 3.    This bill shall take effect immediately.